Illinois, session 104th, HB3830.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 1-55 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/1-55)7    Sec. 1-55. 33 1/3%. One-third of the the fair cash value of 8property, as determined by the Department's sales ratio 9studies for the 3 most recent years preceding the assessment 10year, adjusted to take into account any changes in assessment 11levels implemented since the data for the studies were 12collected.13(Source: P.A. 86-1481; 87-877; 88-455.)